Massachusetts, session 194th, S223.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3L of chapter 143 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by deleting the words "for hire" in paragraph 4 and
paragraph 5.
SECTION 2. Section 3L of chapter 143 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following paragraph:-
“Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide the inspector of wires with the
authority to reject a permit application of an applicant who is not a certified electrician; provided,
that the property indicated on the permit application is the applicant’s primary residence, the
applicant is the owner of the property, and the property is no greater than a single family house.”
of 1